test/src/gt-desc-yamls/adjDES_gt-desc.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked
# c = Comp or Superl attested in corpus

# Adjectives that have a subform.

Tests:
  Adjective - almulasj: # ÅLLAGASJ, DÁRBBOLASJ
    almulasj+A+Attr: [almulasj, almmulasj, álmmulasj]
    almulasj+A+Sg+Nom: [almulasj, almmulasj, álmmulasj]
    almulasj+A+Sg+Acc: [almulattjav, almmulattjav, álmmulattjav]
    almulasj+A+Pl+Nom: [almulattja, almmulattja, álmmulattja]
    almulasj+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [almulabbo, almulæbbo, almuläbbo, almulubbo]
    almulasj+A+Der/Comp+A+Attr: [almulap, almulup]
    almulasj+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [almulamos, almulæmos, almulämos, almulumos]

  Adjective - bavlak: # AGAdj
    bavlak+A+Attr: [bavhlak, bavlak]
    bavlak+A+Sg+Nom: [bavhlak, bavlak]
    bavlak+A+Sg+Ine: [bavhlagin, bavlagin]
    bavlak+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: []
    bavlak+A+Der/Comp+A+Attr: []
    bavlak+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - duplæksa: # BASSTEL, BOREÁLA
    duplæksa+A+Attr: duplevsa
    duplæksa+A+Sg+Nom: [duplæksa, dupläksa, dupleksa]
    duplæksa+A+Sg+Gen: []
    duplæksa+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: []
    duplæksa+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - goanntsá: # GIEVRRA, HÁVSSKE
    goanntsá+A+Attr: goanntsás
    goanntsá+A+Sg+Nom: goanntsá
    goanntsá+A+Sg+Ela: goanntsás
    goanntsá+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: goanntsáp
    goanntsá+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: goanntsámus

  Adjective - gájvas: # TJIEGOS
    gájvas+A+Attr: [gájves, gájvas]
    gájvas+A+Sg+Nom: [gájvas, gájves]
    gájvas+A+Sg+Gen: [gájvvasa, gájvvása]
    gájvas+A+Sg+Acc: [gájvvasav, gájvvásav]
    gájvas+A+Sg+Ill: [gájvvasij, gájvvásij]
    gájvas+A+Sg+Ine: [gájvvasin, gájvvásin]
    gájvas+A+Sg+Ela: [gájvvasis, gájvvásis]
    gájvas+A+Sg+Com: [gájvvasijn, gájvvásijn, gájvvasijna, gájvvásijna]
    gájvas+A+Pl+Nom: [gájvvasa, gájvvása]
    gájvas+A+Pl+Gen: [gájvvasij, gájvvásij]
    gájvas+A+Pl+Acc: [gájvvasijt, gájvvásijt]
    gájvas+A+Pl+Ill: [gájvvasijda, gájvvásijda]
    gájvas+A+Pl+Ine: [gájvvasijn, gájvvásijn]
    gájvas+A+Pl+Ela: [gájvvasijs, gájvvásijs]
    gájvas+A+Pl+Com: [gájvvasij, gájvvásij]
    gájvas+A+Ess: [gájvvasin, gájvvásin]
    gájvas+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [gájvvasabbo, gájvvásabbo, gájvvasæbbo, gájvvasäbbo, gájvvásæbbo, gájvvásäbbo, gájvvasubbo, gájvvásubbo]
    gájvas+A+Der/Comp+A+Attr: [gájvvásap, gájvvásup, gájvvasap, gájvvasup]
    gájvas+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [gájvvasamos, gájvvasumos, gájvvasæmos, gájvvasämos, gájvvásamos,gájvvásæmos, gájvvásämos, gájvvásumos]

  Adjective - gåntsas: #
    gåntsas+A+Attr: [gåntsas, goantsas]
    gåntsas+A+Sg+Nom: [gåntsas, goantsas]
    gåntsas+A+Sg+Gen: goanntsasa
    gåntsas+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [goanntsasabbo,goanntsasæbbo, goanntsasäbbo,goanntsasubbo]
    gåntsas+A+Der/Comp+A+Attr: [goanntsasap, goanntsasup]
    gåntsas+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [goanntsasamos,goanntsasæmos, goanntsasämos,goanntsasumos]

  Adjective - hæhkkaráduk: # BASSTEL, AGAdj
    hæhkkaráduk+A+Attr: [hæhkkaráduk, hähkkaráduk, hähkkarádugis, hæhkkarádugis]
    hæhkkaráduk+A+Sg+Nom: [hæhkkaráduk, hähkkaráduk]
    hæhkkaráduk+A+Sg+Com: [hæhkkarádugijn, hähkkarádugijn, hähkkarádugijna, hæhkkarádugijna]
    hæhkkaráduk+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [hæhkkarádugabbo, hähkkarádugabbo, hæhkkarádugæbbo, hæhkkarádugäbbo,hæhkkarádugubbo, hähkkarádugubbo, hähkkarádugæbbo, hähkkarádugäbbo]
    hæhkkaráduk+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [hæhkkarádugamos, hähkkarádugamos, hæhkkarádugumos, hähkkarádugumos,hæhkkarádugæmos, hæhkkarádugämos, hähkkarádugämos, hähkkarádugæmos]

  Adjective - iehpeformælla: # ELLA_LASJ_NO_NORM
    iehpeformælla+A+Attr: [iehpeformella,iehpeformellalasj]
    iehpeformælla+A+Err/Orth+Attr: [iehpeformela, iehpeformála, iehpeformálalasj]
    iehpeformælla+A+Sg+Nom: [iehpeformælla, iehpeformälla] ]
    iehpeformælla+A+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: [iehpeformella, iehpeformálla, iehpeformálalasj]
    iehpeformælla+A+Sg+Ine: [iehpeformellan, iehpeformellalattjan]
    iehpeformælla+A+Err/Orth+Sg+Ine: [iehpeformálan, iehpeformálalattjan]
    iehpeformælla+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: []
    iehpeformælla+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - lånjok: # BASSTEL, LEXATTR
    lånjok+A+Attr: [lånjogis, låddnjis, lånjugis]
    lånjok+A+Sg+Nom: [lånjok, lånjuk]
    lånjok+A+Sg+Gen: [lånjoga, lånjuga]
    lånjok+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [lånjogabbo,lånjogæbbo, lånjogäbbo, lånjogubbo, lånjugabbo,lånjugæbbo, lånjugäbbo,lånjugubbo]
    lånjok+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [lånjogamos,lånjogæmos, lånjogämos,lånjogumos, lånjugamos,lånjugæmos, lånjugämos,lånjugumos]

  Adjective - nanos: # TJIEGOS, NUORTTALABBO
    nanos+A+Attr: [nanos, nanus]
    nanos+A+Sg+Nom: [nanos, nanus]
    nanos+A+Sg+Acc: [nannusav, nanusav]
    nanos+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [nannusabbo, nannusæbbo, nannusäbbo,nannusubbo, nanusabbo,nanusæbbo, nanusäbbo,nanusubbo]
    nanos+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [nannusamos,nannusæmos, nannusämos,nannusumos, nanusamos,nanusumos,nanusæmos, nanusämos]

  Adjective - tsåhkevigák: # At, AGAdj
    tsåhkevigák+A+Attr: [tsåhkevigák, tsåhkevigágis]
    tsåhkevigák+A+Sg+Nom: tsåhkevigák
    tsåhkevigák+A+Sg+Com: [tsåhkevigágijn, tsåhkevigágijna]
    tsåhkevigák+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: []
    tsåhkevigák+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: []
  
  Adjective - tjábbámus: # TJAVGGÁMUS, Err/Der
    tjábbámus+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: tjábbámus
    tjábbámus+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Acc: tjábbámusáv
    tjábbámus+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Ill: tjábbámussaj
  
  Adjective - sahtemus: # TJAVGGÁMUS, Err/Der
    sahtemus+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: sahtemus
    sahtemus+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Acc: sahtemusáv
    sahtemus+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Ill: sahtemussaj

  Adjective - vedjat: # 
    vedjat+A+Attr: [vieddjis, viedjis]
    vedjat+A+Sg+Nom: [vædjat, vädjat, vedjat]
    vedjat+A+Sg+Ine: [væddjadin, väddjadin, vedjadin, vædjadin, vädjadin]
    
  Adjective - antisosiálla: #  ÁLLA
    antisosiálla+A+Err/Der+Attr: antisosiálalasj
    antisosiálla+A+Err/Der+Sg+Nom: antisosiálalasj
    antisosiálla+A+Err/Der+Sg+Gen: antisosiálalattja
    antisosiálla+A+Err/Der+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: antisosiálalabbo
    antisosiálla+A+Err/Der+Der/AAdv+Adv: antisosiálalattjat


  Adjective - aspektuálla: # ÁLLA
    aspektuælla+A+Err/Der+Attr: aspektuellalasj
    aspektuælla+A+Err/Der+Sg+Nom: aspektuellalasj
    aspektuælla+A+Err/Der+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: aspektuellalabbo
    aspektuælla+A+Err/Der+Der/AAdv+Adv: aspektuellalattjat


  Adjective - paralælla: # ÆLLA
    paralælla+A+Err/Der+Attr: paralellalasj
    paralælla+A+Err/Der+Sg+Nom: paralellalasj
    paralælla+A+Err/Der+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: paralellalabbo
    
  Adjective - senijlla: # 
    senijlla+A+Err/Der+Attr: [senijlalasj]
    senijlla+A+Err/Der+Sg+Nom: [senijlalasj]
    senijlla+A+Err/Der+Sg+Acc: [senijlalattjav]
    senijlla+A+Err/Der+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [senijlalabbo]
    senijlla+A+Err/Der+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [senijlalamos]
    senijlla+A+Err/Der+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [senijlalappot]
    senijlla+A+Err/Der+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [ssenijlalabmusit]
    senijlla+A+Err/Der+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: [senijlalappusj]
    senijlla+A+Err/Der+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [senijlalapputjit]
    senijlla+A+Err/Der+Der/AAdv+Adv: [senijlalattjat]
    

  Adjective - destruktijvalasj: # DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM
    destruktijvva+A+Err/Der+A+Attr:  [destruktijvalasj]
    destruktijvva+A+Err/Der+A+Sg+Nom: [destruktijvalasj]
    destruktijvva+A+Err/Der+A+Sg+Ela: [destruktijvalattjas]
    destruktijvva+A+Err/Der+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [destruktijvalabbo]
    destruktijvva+A+Err/Der+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [destruktijvalamos]
